Utah statutes.
11-14-317.   Bonds as legal investments -- Use as security for the faithful
performance of acts.
(1)  All bonds issued under this chapter or other applicable law shall be
legal investments for:
(a)  all trust funds, including those under the jurisdiction of the state;
(b)  the funds of all insurance companies, banks, and both commercial and
savings and trust companies;
(c)  the state school funds; and
(d)  all sinking funds under the control of the state treasurer.
(2)  If funds may by law be invested in or loaned upon the security of bonds
of a county, city, or school district, funds may be invested in or loaned upon
the security of the bonds of any other local political subdivision.
(3)  If bonds of a county, city, or school district may by law be used as
security for the faithful performance on execution of any court or private
trust or any other act, the bonds of any other local political subdivision may
be used in the same way.
